Utah statutes.
31A-42-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the board of directors of the Utah Defined Contribution Risk Adjuster created in Section 31A-42-201.

(2)  "Defined benefit plan" is as defined in Section 31A-30-202.

(3)  "Risk adjuster" means the defined contribution risk adjustment mechanism created in Section 31A-42-201.



Amended by Chapter 68, 2010 General Session

